Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 1. Board of Social Work Examiners.

Administrative Code. —

For board of social work examiners, see 12 AAC 18.

Sec. 08.95.010.
Creation and membership of the board.

There is created the Board of Social Work Examiners composed of five members, as follows: one member licensed under this chapter as a baccalaureate social worker; one member licensed under this chapter as a master social worker; two members licensed under this chapter as clinical social workers; and one public member who has never been licensed under this chapter. At least one of the licensed members must be a person who is not an employee of a federal, state, or local government.

Members of the board shall elect a member of the board as chair. The chair serves for a term of one year.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 2 ch 43 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective June 30, 2018, in (a), deleted “or of a private nonprofit organization that is exempt from federal income tax” at the end.

Sec. 08.95.020.
Board meetings.

The board shall hold at least two meetings each year. The board may hold additional meetings at the call of the chair or of a majority of the board members.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 6 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Sec. 08.95.030.
Duties.

The board shall

issue licenses to qualified applicants;

adopt regulations

requiring that continuing education requirements be satisfied before a license is renewed;

establishing a code of professional ethics that a licensee must observe;

establishing standards of practice for social work performed by a licensee; and

establishing standards for supervisors and for supervision that is required for licensure under AS

08.95.110(a)

;

adopt regulations necessary to carry out the duties and purpose of this chapter.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 19 ch 6 SLA 1998; am § 7 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and employment requirements, see 12 AAC 18, art. 1.

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 18, art. 2.

Sec. 08.95.040.
Continuing education requirement.

The board shall adopt continuing education requirements for persons licensed under this chapter. Continuing education requirements that must be satisfied before the first biennial renewal of a person’s license must include a minimum of 45 hours of education or training with a minimum of three hours in professional ethics, six hours in substance abuse, and six hours in cross-cultural education that includes issues relating to Alaska Natives. After the first biennial renewal of a license, continuing education requirements for that person’s license renewal must include three hours in professional ethics, six hours in substance abuse, and six hours in cross-cultural education, three hours of which must include issues relating to Alaska Natives.

The board shall appoint three persons licensed under this chapter to serve as a continuing education committee. The committee shall advise the board on matters related to continuing education for clinical social workers. One person appointed to the committee must be familiar with social problems in the rural areas of the state.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am § 8 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 18, art. 2.

Sec. 08.95.050.
Disciplinary sanctions.

The board may impose a disciplinary sanction under AS

08.01.075

if it finds that a licensee

secured a license through deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation;

engaged in deceit, fraud, or intentional misrepresentation in the course of providing professional services or in the course of professional activities;

advertised professional services in a false or misleading manner;

violated this chapter, a regulation adopted under this chapter, or an order issued by the board;

is the subject of a disciplinary sanction or other adverse licensing action in another jurisdiction relating to a social work license;

failed to report to the board that the licensee is or was the subject of a disciplinary proceeding or other adverse licensing action in another jurisdiction relating to a social work license;

has been convicted of a felony or has been convicted of a misdemeanor that reflects on the licensee’s ability to practice competently and professionally;

intentionally or negligently engaged in, or permitted persons under the licensee’s supervision to engage in, client care that did not conform to minimum professional standards or to the standards of practice adopted by the board regardless of whether actual injury to the client occurred;

continued to practice after becoming unfit due to

professional incompetence;

failure to keep informed of current professional practices;

addiction to or severe dependency on alcohol or other drugs that impairs the ability to practice safely; or

physical or mental disability;

engaged in lewd, immoral, or unethical conduct in connection with the delivery of professional services to clients; or

while licensed to practice clinical social work, engaged in sexual contact with a person during the time period that the person was a client or within two years after termination of the licensee’s professional relationship with the client.

The board may not impose disciplinary sanctions on a licensee for the evaluation, diagnosis, or treatment of a person through audio, video, or data communications when physically separated from the person if

the licensee or another licensed health care provider is available to provide follow-up care;

the licensee requests that the person consent to sending a copy of all records of the encounter to a primary care provider if the licensee is not the person’s primary care provider and, if the person consents, the licensee sends the records to the person’s primary care provider; and

the licensee meets the requirements established by the board in regulation.

The board shall adopt regulations restricting the evaluation, diagnosis, supervision, and treatment of a person as authorized under (b) of this section by establishing standards of care, including standards for training, confidentiality, supervision, practice, and related issues.

History.

(§ 9 ch 118 SLA 1998; am § 15 ch 25 SLA 2016)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective September 19, 2016, added (b) and (c).